Vermont, session 2025-2026, S243.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermont ranks sixth per capita in refugee resettlement;
(2) the Governor has recognized the important role immigrants play in
Vermont’s economy;
(3) when health information is available in only one language and only
in written format, it creates barriers that lead to confusion;
(4) the Vermont Language Justice Project’s videos fill a critical gap in
patient education, particularly for families with limited English proficiency;
(5) the Vermont Language Justice Project has created and distributed
videos pertaining to COVID-19 and COVID-19 testing; the importance of
immunizations and how immunizations work; Mpox; preventing mosquito and
tick bites; and safety during flood events, hot and cold weather, cyanobacteria
outbreaks, wildfires, and more;
(6) the Vermont Language Justice Project’s videos are made in 10 to 21
of the languages commonly spoken in Vermont and in collaboration with the
Vermont Department of Health;
VT LEG #390236 v.1

No. 151 Page 2 of 2
2026
(7) the Vermont Language Justice Project is usually able to respond to a
crisis within 24 hours with information in multiple languages and in multiple
formats, such as written translations, audio files, and videos; and
(8) in January 2025, the Vermont Language Justice Project’s grant from
the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention abruptly ended, leaving it
to be funded solely through donations from individuals and foundations and
through fee-for-service work.
Sec. 2. VERMONT LANGUAGE JUSTICE PROJECT
In fiscal year 2027, the Office of Racial Equity may contract with the
Vermont Language Justice Project to prepare informational materials at the
request of State agencies and departments, as needed, to assist Vermonters who
speak languages other than English in the event of a disease outbreak, natural
disaster, or other public health emergency, including ongoing personal and
public health information. The Department of Buildings and General Services
shall assist the Vermont Language Justice Project as it navigates the process to
become added to the State’s list of approved contractors.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 16, 2026
VT LEG #390236 v.1